New York, session 2025-2026, S2430.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The education law is amended by adding a new section 819 to 2 read as follows: 3 § 819. Instruction on climate change. 1. Subject to appropriation, 4 beginning with the two thousand twenty-six--two thousand twenty-seven 5 school year, every public school shall provide instruction on climate 6 change and such instruction may be provided through interdisciplinary 7 instruction, where appropriate. Such instruction shall include, but not 8 be limited to, identifying the causes and impacts of climate change on 9 individuals, environments and communities, and learning to evaluate 10 solutions. Such instruction on climate change shall be in alignment with 11 state learning standards, as appropriate. 12 2. The department shall, subject to appropriation, prepare and make 13 available guidance and resources for educators including, but not limit- 14 ed to, supports for school districts to offer professional learning 15 opportunities, that may be used to assist such educators in meeting the 16 requirements of this section. The department shall also, subject to 17 appropriation, provide technical assistance to school districts as such 18 school districts transition their operations, including but not limited 19 to facilities and transportation, to more energy efficient and climate 20 friendly approaches. 21 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD03181-01-5